Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1205
Distributions from fund; qualifications.

(1) Any rural or suburban fire protection district which contains within its boundaries (a) an assumed population of thirty thousand or more or (b) at least sixty percent of the assumed population of any one county which is contained in whole or in part within the district residing outside the city limits of any city of the first, primary, or metropolitan class in such county shall receive a distribution from the Mutual Finance Assistance Fund pursuant to section 35-1206.

(2) Any mutual finance organization which (a) has entered into an agreement pursuant to section 35-1204 and (b) contains within the boundaries of its members (i) an assumed population of thirty thousand or more or (ii) at least sixty percent of the assumed county population of any one county which is contained in whole or in part within the mutual finance organization residing outside the city limits of any city of the first, primary, or metropolitan class in such county shall receive a distribution from the fund pursuant to section 35-1206.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) The assumed population residing within the boundaries of a rural or suburban fire protection district or mutual finance organization equals (i) the estimated county population as determined based on the most recent estimates of the United States Bureau of the Census for counties, minus (ii) the estimated population of all cities and villages in the county as certified pursuant to section 77-3,119, multiplied by (iii) a fraction, the numerator of which is the valuation within the rural or suburban fire protection district or mutual finance organization which is not within a city or village and the denominator of which is the valuation in the county which is not contained within a city of the first, primary, or metropolitan class, and added to (iv) the most recent estimated population of all cities of the second class and villages in the fire protection district or mutual finance organization as certified pursuant to section 77-3,119;

(b) The assumed county population residing outside the city limits of any city of the first, primary, or metropolitan class equals (i) the most recent estimated county population as determined based on the most recent estimates of the United States Bureau of the Census for counties minus (ii) the most recent estimated population of all cities of the first, primary, or metropolitan class in the county as certified pursuant to section 77-3,119;

(c) If a city or village is located in more than one county, the population of the city or village which resides in the county is presumed to be in proportion to the valuation of such city or village which is located in the county; and

(d) If the district or mutual finance organization is located in more than one county and the district or mutual finance organization meets the threshold in subsection (1) or (2) of this section in only one county, the district or mutual finance organization shall qualify for assistance under this section.

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 141, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB399, § 2.